Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.065

Correctional employees—Effect of exemption from firearms restrictions—Liability limited.

The exemptions from firearms restrictions in RCW 9.41.060 and 9.41.300 for correctional personnel and community corrections officers who complete government-sponsored law enforcement firearms training do not create a duty on the part of the state or local governmental entities with respect to the off-duty conduct of correctional personnel and community corrections officers involving the use or misuse of a firearm.

The state of Washington, local governmental entities, and their officers, employees, and agents are not liable for any civil damages caused by the use or misuse of a firearm by off-duty correctional personnel or community corrections officers based on any act or omission in the provision of government-sponsored firearms training to the correctional personnel or community corrections officers.

[ 2011 c 221 s 3.]